Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.015

Adjustment to bid price—Conditions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 39.04.010, a state contracting authority is authorized to negotiate an adjustment to a bid price, based upon agreed changes to the contract plans and specifications, with a low responsive bidder under the following conditions:

(1) All bids for a state public works project involving buildings and any associated building utilities and appendants exceed the available funds, as certified by the appropriate fiscal officer;

(2) The apparent low responsive bid does not exceed the available funds by: (a) Five percent on projects valued under one million dollars; (b) the greater of fifty thousand dollars or two and one-half percent for projects valued between one million dollars and five million dollars; or (c) the greater of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars or one percent for projects valued over five million dollars; and

(3) The negotiated adjustment will bring the bid price within the amount of available funds.

[ 1989 c 59 s 1.]